Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 11 Utilization of Unused Prescription Drugs

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this article, see 23 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 197 (2006).

26-4-190 through 26-4-195.
[Reserved]

History.

Code 1981, §§

26-4-190

through 26-4-195, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 152, § 1/HB 1178; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-21/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 8/SB 178; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-8/HB 214; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 524, § 2/HB 897, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 524, § 2/HB 897 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2016.